Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1350
Liquid mercury thermometer; prohibited acts.

No liquid mercury thermometer containing elemental mercury shall be sold, given away, or otherwise distributed in this state.

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 4.